test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UNG_STEM_2.gt-norm.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_UNG_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_UNG_STEM_2

     ñ'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñ'usägwáangaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+INDIRECT+PAST: ñ'usägwáangaan
     ñ'usägúng+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñ'usägwáangaas
     ñ'usägúng+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñ'usägwáangaa.ang
     ñ'usägúng+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñ'usägwáang'ahlanggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+CERTAIN+PAST: ñ'usägwáang'ahlanggan
     ñ'usägúng+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñ'usägwáang'ahlanggiinii
     ñ'usägúng+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñ'usägwáang'ahlans
     ñ'usägúng+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñ'usägwáangaa'ahlang
     ñ'usägúng+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñ'usägwáangaa'ahlanggaa
     ñ'usägúng+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñ'usägwáangaa'ahlanggang
     ñ'usägúng+V+REFLEXIVE: ñ'usägwáang'ahl
